Indiana, session 2026, HB1162.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 12-7-2-40.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 40.3. "Compensation", for purposes of
IC 12-8-1.6-5.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 12-8-1.6-5.5(a).
SECTION 2. IC 12-7-2-62.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 62.5. "Direct care staff", for purposes of
IC 12-8-1.6-5.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 12-8-1.6-5.5(b).
SECTION 3. IC 12-8-1.6-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) As used in this section,
"compensation" means any of the following:
(1) Salaries and wages.
(2) Benefits, including the following:
(A) Paid time off.
(B) Health, dental, and vision insurance.
(C) Life and disability insurance.
2026 IN 1162—LS 6569/DI 104


(D) Worker's compensation.
(E) Qualifying pensions and other retirement benefits.
(F) Tuition reimbursement.
(G) The employer's share of payroll taxes.
(H) Travel reimbursement.
(I) Other remuneration under the federal Fair Labor
Standards Act of 1938, as amended (29 U.S.C. 201-219).
The term does not include office administrative costs, supervision,
or other program or overhead costs.
(b) As used in this section, "direct care staff" means an
employee of a home and community based services waiver
provider who provides direct, hands on care for a participant
under the home and community based services waiver.
(c) A provider that provides attendant care services under a
home and community based services waiver must use at least
seventy percent (70%) of the state share of Medicaid per diem
reimbursement for the services provided on compensation for the
provider's direct care staff providing attendant care services.
(d) A provider described in subsection (c) shall, not later than
June 30 of each year, submit a direct care staff cost report to the
office of the secretary documenting that the provider has complied
with subsection (c). The report must meet at least the following
requirements:
(1) Be based upon actual, documented expenditures.
(2) Be attested to by an authorized representative of the
provider.
(3) Include the following information for the previous
calendar year:
(A) The provider's total attendant care revenue under a
home and community based services waiver.
(B) The total spent as compensation for direct care staff
providing attendant care services, separated by each
category described in subsection (a).
(C) The total dollars spent on supervision costs for direct
care staff.
(D) The total dollars spent on administrative, overhead,
and program support costs.
(4) Include any other information deemed relevant and
required by the office to ensure compliance with this section.
2026 IN 1162—LS 6569/DI 104